Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2364.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2160, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2160. Abortion-inducing drugs; violations; classifications; definition A. An abortion-inducing drug may be provided only by a qualified physician in accordance with the requirements of this chapter. B. A manufacturer, supplier or physician or any other person is prohibited from providing an abortion-inducing drug via courier, delivery or mail service. C. This section does not apply to drugs that may be known to cause an abortion but that are prescribed for other medical indications. D. A person who knowingly violates subsection B of this section by selling, furnishing, mailing, shipping, delivering or causing to be mailed, shipped or delivered an abortion-inducing drug is guilty of a class 5 felony. E. A licensed health care provider, pharmacist, manufacturer, supplier or carrier who violates subsection B of this section while acting in the course and scope of the person's employment is guilty of a class 4 felony. F. A person who knowingly orders, solicits, requests, receives or attempts to receive an abortion-inducing drug by courier, delivery or mail service in violation of subsection B of this section is guilty of a class 1 misdemeanor. G. Notwithstanding any other law, a civil action may not be brought under this section against a motor carrier or freight forwarder as defined in 49 United States Code Section 13102, an air carrier as defined in 49 United States Code section 40102 or a third-party logistics provider as defined by 21 United States CodeS section 360eee. D. H. For the purposes of this section, "abortion-inducing drug" means a medicine or drug or any other substance used for a medication abortion. END_STATUTE